Connecticut, session 2026, HB05059.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to establish a credit against the
personal income tax in the amount of six per cent of the research and
development expenses paid or incurred for a taxable year by pass-
through entities.